Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2413
Limited agent, defined.

Limited agent shall mean a licensee whose duties and obligations to a client are those set forth in sections 76-2417 to 76-2419.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 13.